client/modules/cm-espells/vendor/de.aff
SFX p Y 320
SFX p   a        en         a
SFX p   Aal      Äle     Aal
SFX p   Aal      Älen     Aal
SFX p   aal      äle     aal
SFX p   aal      älen     aal
SFX p   ab       äbe     ab
SFX p   ab       äben     ab
SFX p   aben     äben     aben
SFX p   abel     äbel     abel
SFX p   abel     äbeln     abel
SFX p   ach      äche      ach
SFX p   ach      ächen      ach
SFX p   acht     ächte      acht
SFX p   acht     ächten      acht
SFX p   achs     ächse      achs
SFX p   achs     ächsen      achs
SFX p   ack      äcke      ack
SFX p   ack      äcken      ack
SFX p   adt      ädte      adt
SFX p   adt      ädten      adt
SFX p   ade      äde     ade
SFX p   ade      äden     ade
SFX p   aden     äden     aden
SFX p   afel     äfel     afel
SFX p   afel     äfeln     afel
SFX p   agel     ägel     agel
SFX p   agel     ägeln     agel
SFX p   agen     ägen     agen
SFX p   afen     äfen       afen
SFX p   aft      äfte       aft
SFX p   aft      äften      aft
SFX p   ag       äge       ag
SFX p   ag       ägen      ag
SFX p   agen     ägen       agen
SFX p   ahl     ähle      ahl
SFX p   ahl     ählen     ahl
SFX p   ahn     ähne      ahn
SFX p   ahn     ähnen     ahn
SFX p   aht     ähte      aht
SFX p   aht     ähten     aht
SFX p   al      äle      al
SFX p   al      älen     al
SFX p   aler    äler      aler
SFX p   aler    älern     aler
SFX p   alg     älge      alg
SFX p   alg     älgen     alg
SFX p   all     älle      all
SFX p   all     ällen     all
SFX p   als     älse      als
SFX p   als     älsen     als
SFX p   alt     älte      alt
SFX p   alt     älten     alt
SFX p   amm     ämme     amm
SFX p   amm     ämmen     amm
SFX p   ammer   ämmer     ammer
SFX p   ammer   ämmern     ammer
SFX p   ams     ämse     ams
SFX p   ams     ämsen     ams
SFX p   ampf    ämpfe     ampf
SFX p   ampf    ämpfen     ampf
SFX p   an      äne      an
SFX p   an      änen     an
SFX p   anal    anäle      anal
SFX p   anal    anälen     anal
SFX p   and     ände      and
SFX p   and     änden     and
SFX p   andel   ändel      andel
SFX p   andel   ändeln     andel
SFX p   ang     änge      ang
SFX p   ang     ängen     ang
SFX p   angel     ängel      angel
SFX p   angel     ängeln     angel
SFX p   Angel     Ängel      Angel
SFX p   Angel     Ängeln     Angel
SFX p   Angst     Ängste      Angst
SFX p   Angst     Ängsten     Angst
SFX p   angst     ängste      angst
SFX p   angst     ängsten     angst
SFX p   anft     änfte      anft
SFX p   anft     änften     anft
SFX p   ank    änke      ank
SFX p   ank     änken     ank
SFX p   anker    änker      anker
SFX p   anker     änkern     anker
SFX p   ans     änse      ans
SFX p   ans     änsen     ans
SFX p   anst     änste      anst
SFX p   anst     änsten     anst
SFX p   antel     äntel      antel
SFX p   antel     änteln     antel
SFX p   anz    änze      anz
SFX p   anz    änzen     anz
SFX p   apf     äpfe      apf
SFX p   apf     äpfen     apf
SFX p   apfen     äpfen      apfen
SFX p   aps    äpse      aps
SFX p   aps     äpsen     aps
SFX p   apst    äpste      apst
SFX p   apst     äpsten     apst
SFX p   apfe     äpfe      apfe
SFX p   apfe     äpfen     apfe
SFX p   apfel     äpfel      apfel
SFX p   apfel     äpfeln     apfel
SFX p   Apfel     Äpfel      Apfel
SFX p   Apfel     Äpfeln     Apfel
SFX p   ar    äre     ar
SFX p   ar    ären    ar
SFX p   arg    ärge     arg
SFX p   arg    ärgen    arg
SFX p   Arg    Ärge     Arg
SFX p   Arg    Ärgen    Arg
SFX p   ark    ärke     ark
SFX p   ark    ärken    ark
SFX p   arkt    ärkte     arkt
SFX p   arkt    ärkten    arkt
SFX p   arm    ärme     arm
SFX p   arm    ärmen    arm
SFX p   Arm    Ärme     Arm
SFX p   Arm    Ärmen    Arm
SFX p   art    ärte     art
SFX p   art    ärten    art
SFX p   arten     ärten      arten
SFX p   asser     ässer      asser
SFX p   asser     ässern      asser
SFX p   ast     äste      ast
SFX p   ast     ästen      ast
SFX p   Ast     Äste      Ast
SFX p   Ast     Ästen      Ast
SFX p   asten     ästen      asten
SFX p   arsch    ärsche     arsch
SFX p   arsch    ärschen    arsch
SFX p   Arsch    Ärsche     Arsch
SFX p   Arsch    Ärschen    Arsch
SFX p   arzt    ärzte     arzt
SFX p   arzt    ärzten    arzt
SFX p   Arzt    Ärzte     Arzt
SFX p   Arzt    Ärzten    Arzt
SFX p   as     äse      as
SFX p   as     äsen    as
SFX p   ass     ässe      ass
SFX p   ass     ässen     ass
SFX p   aß     asses      aß
SFX p   aß     äße      aß
SFX p   aß     äßen     aß
SFX p   asten     ästen      asten
SFX p   at     äte      at
SFX p   at     äten    at
SFX p   ater     äter      ater
SFX p   ater     ätern    ater
SFX p   att     ätte      att
SFX p   att     ätten    att
SFX p   attel     ättel      attel
SFX p   attel     ätteln    attel
SFX p   atz     ätze      atz
SFX p   atz     ätzen     atz
SFX p   au       äue      au
SFX p   au       äuen     au
SFX p   auch     äuche      auch
SFX p   auch     äuchen     auch
SFX p   auf     äufe      auf
SFX p   auf     äufen     auf
SFX p   aufe     äufe      aufe
SFX p   aufe     äufen     aufe
SFX p   aul       äule  aul
SFX p   aul       äulen  aul
SFX p   aum     äume      aum
SFX p   aum     äumen     aum
SFX p   aun     äune      aun
SFX p   aun     äunen     aun
SFX p   aus äuse aus
SFX p   aus äusen aus
SFX p   aus     äuse     aus
SFX p   aus     äusen    aus
SFX p   auss     äusse     auss
SFX p   auss     äussen    auss
SFX p   ausch     äusche      ausch
SFX p   ausch     äuschen     ausch
SFX p   aust     äuste     aust
SFX p   aust     äusten    aust
SFX p   aut     äute     aut
SFX p   aut     äuten    aut
SFX p   axt     äxte     axt
SFX p   axt     äxten    axt
SFX p   Axt     Äxte     Axt
SFX p   Axt     Äxten    Axt
SFX p   ens entia  ens
SFX p   ens enzien  ens
SFX p   eß   esses   eß
SFX p   is     en        is
SFX p   irma irmen  irma
SFX p   ium ien  ium
SFX p   ium ien  ium
SFX p   o en o
SFX p   och öche  och
SFX p   och öchen  och
SFX p   ochter öchter  ochter
SFX p   ochter öchtern  ochter
SFX p   ock öcke  ock
SFX p   ock öcken  ock
SFX p   of öfe  of
SFX p   of öfen  of
SFX p   og öge  og
SFX p   og ögen  og
SFX p   ogt ögte  ogt
SFX p   ogt ögten  ogt
SFX p   ogel ögel  ogel
SFX p   ogel ögeln  ogel
SFX p   oden öden  oden
SFX p   ofen öfen  ofen
SFX p   ogen ögen  ogen
SFX p   oh öhe  oh
SFX p   oh öhen  oh
SFX p   ohn öhne  ohn
SFX p   ohn öhnen  ohn
SFX p   ohr öhre  ohr
SFX p   ohr öhren  ohr
SFX p   olf ölfe  olf
SFX p   olf ölfen  olf
SFX p   oll ölle  oll
SFX p   oll öllen  oll
SFX p   om  öme  om
SFX p   om  ömen  om
SFX p   on  öne  on
SFX p   on  önen  on
SFX p   oog öge  oog
SFX p   oog ögen  oog
SFX p   opf öpfe  opf
SFX p   opf öpfen  opf
SFX p   ops öpse  ops
SFX p   ops öpsen  ops
SFX p   or öre  or
SFX p   or ören  or
SFX p   orb örbe  orb
SFX p   orb örben  orb
SFX p   orch örche  orch
SFX p   orch örchen  orch
SFX p   orus öre  orus
SFX p   orus ören  orus
SFX p   osch ösche  osch
SFX p   osch öschen  osch
SFX p   oster öster  oster
SFX p   oster östern  oster
SFX p   oss    össe  oss
SFX p   oss    össen  oss
SFX p   oß    össe  oß
SFX p   oß    össen  oß
SFX p   oß      öße       oß
SFX p   oß      ößen      oß
SFX p   ot öte  ot
SFX p   ot öten  ot
SFX p   otz ötze  otz
SFX p   otz ötzen  otz
SFX p   ub      übe       ub
SFX p   ub      üben      ub
SFX p   uch     üche     uch
SFX p   uch     üchen   uch
SFX p   uchs     üchse     uchs
SFX p   uchs     üchsen   uchs
SFX p   ucht     üchte     ucht
SFX p   ucht     üchten   ucht
SFX p   uck      ücke       uck
SFX p   uck      ücken      uck
SFX p   uder      üder       uder
SFX p   uder      üdern      uder
SFX p   uft      üfte       uft
SFX p   uft      üften      uft
SFX p   ug      üge       ug
SFX p   ug      ügen      ug
SFX p   uh      ühe       uh
SFX p   uh      ühen      uh
SFX p   uhl      ühle       uhl
SFX p   uhl      ühlen      uhl
SFX p   ulst      ülste       ulst
SFX p   ulst      ülsten      ulst
SFX p   umpf     ümpfe      umpf
SFX p   umpf     ümpfen     umpf
SFX p   und     ünde      und
SFX p   und     ünden     und
SFX p   ung     ünge      ung
SFX p   ung     üngen     ung
SFX p   unft     ünfte      unft
SFX p   unft     ünften     unft
SFX p   unk     ünke      unk
SFX p   unk     ünken     unk
SFX p   unkt     ünkte      unkt
SFX p   unkt     ünkten     unkt
SFX p   unst     ünste      unst
SFX p   unst     ünsten     unst
SFX p   unsch     ünsche      unsch
SFX p   unsch     ünschen     unsch
SFX p   upf    üpfe      upf
SFX p   upf     üpfen      upf
SFX p   ups    üpse      ups
SFX p   ups     üpsen      ups
SFX p   ur    üre      ur
SFX p   ur     üren      ur
SFX p   urf     ürfe      urf
SFX p   urf     ürfen     urf
SFX p   urm     ürme      urm
SFX p   urm     ürmen     urm
SFX p   urz     ürze      urz
SFX p   urz     ürzen     urz
SFX p   urscht     ürschte      urscht
SFX p   urscht     ürschten     urscht
SFX p   urst     ürste      urst
SFX p   urst     ürsten     urst
SFX p   ut     üte      ut
SFX p   ut     üten     ut
SFX p   usch     üsche      usch
SFX p   usch     üschen     usch
SFX p   uss     üsse      uss
SFX p   uss     üssen     uss
SFX p   ust     üste      ust
SFX p   ust     üsten     ust
SFX p   uß     üße      uß
SFX p   uß     üßen     uß
SFX p   uß     üsse      uß
SFX p   uß     üssen     uß
SFX p   utter     ütter      utter
SFX p   utter     üttern     utter
SFX q Y 6
SFX q   ss      sse        ss
SFX q   ss      sses       ss
SFX q   ss      ssen       ss
SFX q   ß       sse        ß
SFX q   ß       sses       ß
SFX q   ß       ssen       ß
SFX r Y 5
SFX r au auten au
SFX r on  en   on
SFX r os  en   os
SFX r  um en    um
SFX r us  en     us
SFX s Y 77
SFX s ach ächer ach
SFX s ach ächern ach
SFX s ack äcker ack
SFX s ack äckern ack
SFX s ad äder ad
SFX s ad ädern ad
SFX s al äler al
SFX s al älern al
SFX s alb älber alb
SFX s alb älbern alb
SFX s ald älder ald
SFX s ald äldern ald
SFX s   alt älter  alt
SFX s   alt ältern  alt
SFX s amm ämmer amm
SFX s amm ämmern amm
SFX s ams ämser ams
SFX s ams ämsern ams
SFX s amt ämter amt
SFX s amt ämtern amt
SFX s and änder and
SFX s and ändern and
SFX s ank änker ank
SFX s ank änkern ank
SFX s ann änner ann
SFX s ann ännern ann
SFX s as   äser   as
SFX s as   äsern   as
SFX s   aß     ässer      aß
SFX s   aß     ässern      aß
SFX s ass ässer ass
SFX s ass ässern ass
SFX s att ätter att
SFX s att ättern att
SFX s auch äucher auch
SFX s auch äuchern auch
SFX s aul äuler aul
SFX s aul äulern aul
SFX s aupt äupter aupt
SFX s aupt äuptern aupt
SFX s aus äuser aus
SFX s aus äusern aus
SFX s aut äuter aut
SFX s aut äutern aut
SFX s   ieh   iecher  ieh
SFX s   och öcher  och
SFX s   och öchern  och
SFX s   olk ölker  olk
SFX s   olk ölkern  olk
SFX s   olz ölzer  olz
SFX s   olz ölzern  olz
SFX s   orf örfer  orf
SFX s   orf örfern  orf
SFX s   orn örner  orn
SFX s   orn örnern  orn
SFX s   ort örter  ort
SFX s   ort örtern  ort
SFX s ott ötter ott
SFX s ott öttern ott
SFX s oß össes oß
SFX s oß össer oß
SFX s oß össern oß
SFX s oss össes oss
SFX s oss össer oss
SFX s oss össern oss
SFX s   ott ötter  ott
SFX s   ott öttern  ott
SFX s uch ücher uch
SFX s uch üchern uch
SFX s uhn ühner uhn
SFX s uhn ühnern uhn
SFX s um ümer um
SFX s um ümern um
SFX s urm ürmer urm
SFX s urm ürmern urm
SFX s ut üter ut
SFX s ut ütern ut
SFX t Y 2
SFX t 0 ns    e
SFX t 0 nen    o
SFX u Y 6
SFX u um  a  um
SFX u us    i  us
SFX u on   a   on
SFX u o   en   o
SFX u e    i    e
SFX u a    e    a
SFX v Y 10
SFX v us  ier  us
SFX v is  en is
SFX v as  en as
SFX v os  en os
SFX v s zien ns
SFX v s ten ns
SFX v s tia ns
SFX v 0  a iv
SFX v on en on
SFX v sta sten sta
SFX w Y 19
SFX w y ies y
SFX w y ys  y
SFX w ic ices  ic
SFX w is iden  is
SFX w ix izes  ix
SFX w ix ices  ix
SFX w iz izes  iz
SFX w iz izien iz
SFX w ex izes  ex
SFX w ex ices  ex
SFX w o  i    o
SFX w s  zien s
SFX w s  tia ens
SFX w 0  ien  [blprzgs]
SFX w e  ien  e
SFX w e  ia    e
SFX w en ina en
SFX w man men man
SFX w Man Men Man
